src-fst-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
# Nominal inflection sublexica

## Inflection for odd-syllable nouns


The default inflectional lexicon for odd-syllable nouns is **N_ODD**.
Words like `gierehtse` is inflected using this lexicon. Other words inflected
like this are: `iehkede` (*evening*), guehpere (*nail*), tjaeleme (*writing*).
Many words in this class will have vowel changes in the second syllable,
between a reduced vowel in odd-syllable forms and a full vowel or diphthong
in even-syllable forms, as displayed in the paradigm below. This alternation
is regulated by two-level rules, but the rules require that the full
vowel is spelled out in the lexical entry as follows:
```
gierehtse+N+Sem/Veh:gieriehts N_ODD "pulk" ; ! gieriehtsisnie
```
That is, in the stem of the entry it says `-rieht-`, where `ie` is the
diphthong that is realised in even-syllable word forms. Another example
word is `darjome`:
```
darjome+N+Sem/Feat:darjoem N_ODD ;
```
with `-oe-` as the stem vowel to get a vowel change `o` => `oe` in even-syllable
word forms.


*gierehtse (*"pulk"*) # Paradigm for odd-syllable nouns examples:*
* *gierehtse:* `gierehtse+N+Sg+Nom`
* *gierehtsen:* `gierehtse+N+Sg+Gen`
* *gierehtsem:* `gierehtse+N+Sg+Acc`
* *gieriehtsasse:* `gierehtse+N+Sg+Ill`
* *gieriehtsisnie:* `gierehtse+N+Sg+Ine`
* *gieriehtsistie:* `gierehtse+N+Sg+Ela`
* *gieriehtsinie:* `gierehtse+N+Sg+Com`
* *gierehtsh:* `gierehtse+N+Pl+Nom`
* *gieriehtsidie:* `gierehtse+N+Pl+Acc`
* *gierehtsi:* `gierehtse+N+Pl+Gen`
* *gieriehtsidie:* `gierehtse+N+Pl+Ill`
* *gieriehtsinie:* `gierehtse+N+Pl+Ine`
* *gieriehtsijstie:* `gierehtse+N+Pl+Ela`
* *gierehtsigujmie:* `gierehtse+N+Pl+Com`
* *gieriehtsinie:* `gierehtse+N+Ess`


* Odd-syll loanwords: lexicon N_ODD_MEETERE


* Odd-syll loanwords on -ihtele, such as kapihtele: lexicon IHTELE

* Odd-syll loanwords: lexicon N_ODD_LOAN


- Odd-syll sg: lexicon N_ODD_SG

- Odd-syll pl: lexicon N_ODD_PL

- Odd-syll loanwords: lexicon N_ODD_ESS

- Default N_ODD plural lexicon: lexicon ÅABPETJH


LEXICON TJE_LASSJE_RESIPR


















*beetnege # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *beetnege:* `beetnege+N+Sg+Nom`
* *beetneh:* `beetnege+N+Sg+Nom`
* *beetnegen:* `beetnege+N+Sg+Gen`
* *beetnegasse:* `beetnege+N+Sg+Ill`
* *beetnegisnie:* `beetnege+N+Sg+Ine`
* *beetnegistie:* `beetnege+N+Sg+Ela`
* *beetneginie:* `beetnege+N+Sg+Com`
* *beetnegh:* `beetnege+N+Pl+Nom`
* *beetnegidie:* `beetnege+N+Pl+Acc`
* *beetnegi:* `beetnege+N+Pl+Gen`
* *beetnegidie:* `beetnege+N+Pl+Ill`
* *beetneginie:* `beetnege+N+Pl+Ine`
* *beetnegijstie:* `beetnege+N+Pl+Ela`
* *beetnegigujmie:* `beetnege+N+Pl+Com`
* *beetneginie:* `beetnege+N+Ess`



















*åeruve # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *åeruve:* `åeruve+N+Sg+Nom`
* *åeruven:* `åeruve+N+Sg+Gen`
* *åeruvem:* `åeruve+N+Sg+Acc`
* *åerievasse:* `åeruve+N+Sg+Ill`
* *åerievisnie:* `åeruve+N+Sg+Ine`
* *åerievistie:* `åeruve+N+Sg+Ela`
* *åerievinie:* `åeruve+N+Sg+Com`
* *åeruvh:* `åeruve+N+Pl+Nom`
* *åerievidie:* `åeruve+N+Pl+Acc`
* *åeruvi:* `åeruve+N+Pl+Gen`
* *åerievidie:* `åeruve+N+Pl+Ill`
* *åerievinie:* `åeruve+N+Pl+Ine`
* *åerievijstie:* `åeruve+N+Pl+Ela`
* *åeruvigujmie:* `åeruve+N+Pl+Com`
* *åerievinie:* `åeruve+N+Ess`
* *åerievadtje:* `åeruve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom`
* *åerievadtjen:* `åeruve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen`
* *åerievadtjem:* `åeruve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc`
* *åerievadtjese:* `åeruve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill`
* *åerievadtjesne:* `åeruve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ine`
* *åerievadtjeste:* `åeruve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ela`
* *åerievadtjine:* `åeruve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com`
* *åerievadtjine:* `åeruve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Ess`
* *åerievadtjh:* `åeruve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom`
* *åerievadtji:* `åeruve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen`
* *åerievadtjide:* `åeruve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc`
* *åerievadtjide:* `åeruve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill`
* *åerievadtjine:* `åeruve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine`
* *åerievadtjijste:* `åeruve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela`
* *åerievadtjigujmie:* `åeruve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com`
* *åerievadtjine:* `åeruve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Ess`






























*seerije # ODD-syllable test examples:*
* *seerije:* `seerije+N+Sg+Nom`
* *seerijem:* `seerije+N+Sg+Acc`
* *seerijen:* `seerije+N+Sg+Gen`
* *seerijasse:* `seerije+N+Sg+Ill`
* *seerijisnie:* `seerije+N+Sg+Ine`
* *seerijistie:* `seerije+N+Sg+Ela`







*daktere # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *daktere:* `daktere+N+Sg+Nom`
* *dakteren:* `daktere+N+Sg+Gen`
* *dakterem:* `daktere+N+Sg+Acc`
* *daktarasse:* `daktere+N+Sg+Ill`
* *daktarisnie:* `daktere+N+Sg+Ine`
* *daktaristie:* `daktere+N+Sg+Ela`
* *daktarinie:* `daktere+N+Sg+Com`
* *dakterh:* `daktere+N+Pl+Nom`
* *daktaridie:* `daktere+N+Pl+Acc`
* *dakteri:* `daktere+N+Pl+Gen`
* *daktaridie:* `daktere+N+Pl+Ill`
* *daktarinie:* `daktere+N+Pl+Ine`
* *daktarijstie:* `daktere+N+Pl+Ela`
* *dakterigujmie:* `daktere+N+Pl+Com`
* *daktarinie:* `daktere+N+Ess`
* *daktaradtje:* `daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom`
* *daktaradtjen:* `daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen`
* *daktaradtjem:* `daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc`
* *daktaradtjese:* `daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill`
* *daktaradtjesne:* `daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ine`
* *daktaradtjeste:* `daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ela`
* *daktaradtjine:* `daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com`
* *daktaradtjine:* `daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Ess`
* *daktaradtjh:* `daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom`
* *daktaradtji:* `daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen`
* *daktaradtjide:* `daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc`
* *daktaradtjide:* `daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill`
* *daktaradtjine:* `daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine`
* *daktaradtjijste:* `daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela`
* *daktaradtjigujmie:* `daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com`
* *daktaradtjine:* `daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Ess`




*australijeenere # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *australijeenere:* `australijeenere+N+Sg+Nom`
* *australijeenerem:* `australijeenere+N+Sg+Acc`
* *australijeeneren:* `australijeenere+N+Sg+Gen`
* *australijeenaristie:* `australijeenere+N+Sg+Ela`




*sisilijaanere # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *sisilijaanere:* `sisilijaanere+N+Sg+Nom`
* *sisilijaanerem:* `sisilijaanere+N+Sg+Acc`
* *sisilijaaneren:* `sisilijaanere+N+Sg+Gen`
* *sisilijaanaristie:* `sisilijaanere+N+Sg+Ela`



*radijaatore # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *radijaatore:* `radijaatore+N+Sg+Nom`
* *radijaatorem:* `radijaatore+N+Sg+Acc`
* *radijaatoren:* `radijaatore+N+Sg+Gen`
* *radijaatorisnie:* `radijaatore+N+Sg+Ine`
* *radijaatoristie:* `radijaatore+N+Sg+Ela`
* *radijaatorinie:* `radijaatore+N+Sg+Com`



*pijaanove # ODD-syllable test examples:*
* *pijaanove:* `pijaanove+N+Sg+Nom`
* *pijaanovem:* `pijaanove+N+Sg+Acc`
* *pijaanoven:* `pijaanove+N+Sg+Gen`
* *pijaanovisnie:* `pijaanove+N+Sg+Ine`
* *pijaanovistie:* `pijaanove+N+Sg+Ela`
* *pijaanovinie:* `pijaanove+N+Sg+Com`



*administraatore# ODD-syllable test examples:*
* *administraatore:* `administraatore+N+Sg+Nom`
* *administraatorem:* `administraatore+N+Sg+Acc`
* *administraatoren:* `administraatore+N+Sg+Gen`
* *administraatorisnie:* `administraatore+N+Sg+Ine`
* *administraatoristie:* `administraatore+N+Sg+Ela`
* *administraatorinie:* `administraatore+N+Sg+Com`



*faktore# Even-syllable test examples:*
* *faktore:* `faktore+N+Sg+Nom`
* *faktorem:* `faktore+N+Sg+Acc`
* *faktoren:* `faktore+N+Sg+Gen`
* *faktorisnie:* `faktore+N+Sg+Ine`
* *faktoristie:* `faktore+N+Sg+Ela`
* *faktorinie:* `faktore+N+Sg+Com`



























## Inflection for nouns ending in oe


The oe with umlaut generate the uml-ones
and have the non-uml ones as +Use/NG.








The oe without umlaut generate the non-uml-ones
only, naturally without +Use/NG.


Lexicon N_OE_OBL is for the -oe nouns without umlaut
Illative is lifted out in order to allow for Use/NG for the
umlauted ones.





































































































































LEXICON EETE_LOAN    loanwords with -eete -


*universiteete # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *universiteete:* `universiteete+N+Sg+Nom`
* *universiteetem:* `universiteete+N+Sg+Acc`
* *universiteetesne:* `universiteete+N+Sg+Ine`
* *universiteetetje:* `universiteete+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom`
* *universiteetetjem:* `universiteete+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc`
* *universiteetetjisnie:* `universiteete+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ine`

















## Inflection for NIEJTE_SG nouns: lexicon NIEJTE_SG
Short descrioption of this lexicon, and its purpose.


















*vïelle # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *vïelle:* `vïelle+N+Sg+Nom`
* *vïellese:* `vïelle+N+Sg+Ill`
* *vïelline:* `vïelle+N+Sg+Com`
* *vïelletje:* `vïelle+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom`
* *vïelletjasse:* `vïelle+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill`
* *vïellemem:* `vïelle+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1`
* *vïelleme:* `vïelle+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1`
* *vïellemdh:* `vïelle+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2`
* *vïellese:* `vïelle+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3`
* *vïellebe:* `vïelle+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3`







LEXICON KONTO   Lexicon for vowel-final words with invariant stems"
```
 : KONTODECL ; 
```
LEXICON KONTODECL  Lexicon for vowel-final words with invariant stems"
```
               +Sg:     KONTO_SG ; 
               +Pl:     KONTO_PL ; 
                        EVEN_ESS ; 
         +Cmp/SgNom:     R        ; 
         +Cmp/SgGen:%>n  R        ; 
         +Cmp/PlGen:%>j  R        ; 
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%»tj GÅATETJE ; 
```





































## Px lexica     = Copy from Julev








* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-sma/blob/main/../src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc)</small>
